Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 76 O.S. 2021, Section 52.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 52.1. No firearm manufacturer, distributor, or seller
who lawfully manufactures, distributes, or sells a firearm or
component parts for a firearm is liable to any person or entity, or
to the estate, successors, or survivors of either, for any injury
suffered, including wrongful death and property damage, because of
use of such firearm by another or because aftermarket modifications
using component parts were made by another to such firearm.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2960 Page 1

Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 2960 Page 2